Washington statutes.
RCW 35.83.070

Supplemental nature of chapter.

The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.83.070. Prior: 1939 c 24 s 8; RRS s 6889-39. Formerly RCW 74.28.070.]